Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-222.
Conditions under which Board may refuse to grant licenses.

The Board may refuse to grant any license if it has reasonable cause to believe that:

The applicant, or if the applicant is a partnership, any general partner thereof, or if the applicant is an association, any member thereof, or limited partner of 10 percent or more with voting rights, or if the applicant is a corporation, any officer, director, or shareholder owning 10 percent or more of its capital stock, or if the applicant is a limited liability company, any member-manager or any member owning 10 percent or more of the membership interest of the limited liability company:

Is not 21 years of age or older;

Has been convicted in any court of a felony or any crime or offense involving moral turpitude under the laws of any state, or of the United States;

Has been convicted, within the five years immediately preceding the date of the application for such license, of a violation of any law applicable to the manufacture, transportation, possession, use or sale of alcoholic beverages;

Is not a person of good moral character and repute;

Is not the legitimate owner of the business proposed to be licensed, or other persons have ownership interests in the business which have not been disclosed;

Has not demonstrated financial responsibility sufficient to meet the requirements of the business proposed to be licensed;

Has maintained a noisy, lewd, disorderly or unsanitary establishment;

Has demonstrated, either by his police record or by his record as a former licensee of the Board, a lack of respect for law and order;

Is unable to speak, understand, read and write the English language in a reasonably satisfactory manner;

Is a person to whom alcoholic beverages may not be sold under §

4.1-304

;

Has the general reputation of drinking alcoholic beverages to excess or is addicted to the use of narcotics;

Has misrepresented a material fact in applying to the Board for a license;

Has defrauded or attempted to defraud the Board, or any federal, state or local government or governmental agency or authority, by making or filing any report, document or tax return required by statute or regulation which is fraudulent or contains a false representation of a material fact; or has willfully deceived or attempted to deceive the Board, or any federal, state or local government, or governmental agency or authority, by making or maintaining business records required by statute or regulation which are false and fraudulent;

Is violating or allowing the violation of any provision of this subtitle in his establishment at the time his application for a license is pending;

Is a police officer with police authority in the political subdivision within which the establishment designated in the application is located;

Is physically unable to carry on the business for which the application for a license is filed or has been adjudicated incapacitated; or

Is a member, agent or employee of the Board.

The place to be occupied by the applicant:

The number of licenses existent in the locality is such that the granting of a license is detrimental to the interest, morals, safety or welfare of the public. In reaching such conclusion the Board shall consider the (i) character of, population of, the number of similar licenses and the number of all licenses existent in the particular county, city or town and the immediate neighborhood concerned; (ii) effect which a new license may have on such county, city, town or neighborhood in conforming with the purposes of this subtitle; and (iii) objections, if any, which may have been filed by a local governing body or local residents.

There exists any law, ordinance, or regulation of the United States, the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, which warrants refusal by the Board to grant any license.

The Board is not authorized under this chapter to grant such license.

a.

Does not conform to the requirements of the governing body of the county, city or town in which such place is located with respect to sanitation, health, construction or equipment, or to any similar requirements established by the laws of the Commonwealth or by Board regulation;

b.

Is so located that granting a license and operation thereunder by the applicant would result in violations of this subtitle, Board regulations, or violation of the laws of the Commonwealth or local ordinances relating to peace and good order;

c.

Is so located with respect to any church; synagogue; hospital; public, private, or parochial school or an institution of higher education; public or private playground or other similar recreational facility; or any state, local, or federal government-operated facility, that the operation of such place under such license will adversely affect or interfere with the normal, orderly conduct of the affairs of such facilities or institutions;

d.

Is so located with respect to any residence or residential area that the operation of such place under such license will adversely affect real property values or substantially interfere with the usual quietude and tranquility of such residence or residential area; or

e.

Under a retail on-premises license is so constructed, arranged or illuminated that law-enforcement officers and special agents of the Board are prevented from ready access to and reasonable observation of any room or area within which alcoholic beverages are to be sold or consumed.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-31; 1954, c. 301; 1956, c. 523; 1972, c. 178; 1974, c. 267; 1976, cc. 67, 698; 1978, c. 446; 1980, c. 299; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 703; 1986, cc. 94, 615; 1989, c. 311; 1990, c. 727; 1992, c. 161; 1993, c. 866; 1997, c. 801; 2002, c. 420; 2007, c. 103; 2020, c. 534.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “or an institution of higher education” for “college or university” and “facility” for “facilities” in subdivision A 2 c to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 420 added “or local residents” at the end of subdivision A 3.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 103 rewrote subdivision A 1.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 534 deleted subsection B, which read: “The Board may refuse to grant any retail wine and beer license, retail beer license or retail wine or winery license to any person who has not resided in the Commonwealth for at least one year immediately preceding application therefor, or to any corporation a majority of the stock of which is owned by persons who have not resided in the Commonwealth for at least one year immediately preceding application therefor, unless refusal to grant the license would in the opinion of the Board substantially impair the transferability of the real property upon which the licensed establishment would be located” and deleted the subsection A designation.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Land Use and Zoning Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2012).

§ 4.1-223.
Conditions under which Board shall refuse to grant licenses.

The Board shall refuse to grant any:

Wholesale beer or wine license to any person, unless such person has established or will establish a place or places of business within the Commonwealth at which will be received and from which will be distributed all alcoholic beverages sold by such person in the Commonwealth. However, in special circumstances, the Board, subject to any regulations it may adopt, may permit alcoholic beverages to be received into or distributed from places other than established places of business.

Wholesale beer license or wholesale wine license to any entity that is owned, in whole or in part, by any manufacturer of alcoholic beverages, any subsidiary or affiliate of such manufacturer, or any person under common control with such manufacturer. This subdivision, however, shall not apply to (i) any applicant for a wholesale beer or wine license filed pursuant to subdivision B 3 b of §

4.1-216

or (ii) the nonprofit, nonstock corporation established pursuant to subdivision B 2 of §

3.2-102

in exercising any privileges granted under subdivision 3 of §

4.1-206.2

.As used in this subdivision, the term “manufacturer” includes any person (i) who brews, vinifies, or distills alcoholic beverages for sale or (ii) engaging in business as a contract brewer, winery, or distillery that owns alcoholic beverage product brand rights, but arranges the manufacture of such products by another person.

Mixed beverage license if the Board determines that in the licensed establishment there (i) is entertainment of a lewd, obscene or lustful nature including what is commonly called stripteasing, topless entertaining, and the like, or which has employees who are not clad both above and below the waist, or who uncommonly expose the body or (ii) are employees who solicit the sale of alcoholic beverages.

Wholesale wine license until the applicant has filed with the Board a bond payable to the Commonwealth, in a sum not to exceed $10,000, upon a form approved by the Board, signed by the applicant or licensee and a surety company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth as surety, and conditioned upon such person’s (i) securing wine only in a manner provided by law, (ii) remitting to the Board the proper tax thereon, (iii) keeping such records as may be required by law or Board regulations, and (iv) abiding by such other laws or Board regulations relative to the handling of wine by wholesale wine licensees. The Board may waive the requirement of both the surety and the bond in cases where the wholesaler has previously demonstrated his financial responsibility.

Mixed beverage license to any member, agent, or employee of the Board or to any corporation or other business entity in which such member, agent or employee is a stockholder or has any other economic interest.Whenever any other elective or appointive official of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof applies for such a license or continuance thereof, he shall state on the application the official position he holds, and whenever a corporation or other business entity in which any such official is a stockholder or has any other economic interests applies for such a license, it shall state on the application the full economic interest of each such official in such corporation or other business entity.

License authorized by this chapter until the license tax required by §

4.1-231.1

is paid to the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-31; 1954, c. 301; 1956, c. 523; 1968, c. 7, §§ 4-98.9, 4-98.17; 1972, cc. 178, 525; 1974, cc. 267, 548; 1975, c. 413; 1976, cc. 67, 698; 1978, c. 446; 1980, c. 299; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 703; 1986, cc. 94, 615; 1989, c. 311; 1990, c. 727; 1992, c. 161; 1993, c. 866; 2000, c. 823; 2007, cc. 870, 932; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2007, cc. 870 and
932, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall implement the provisions of this act consistent with an opinion of the Attorney General dated April 18, 2006, within 90 days of the effective date of this act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.1 references were changed to Title 3.2 references to conform to Acts
2008, c. 860.

Acts
2012, cc. 803 and
835, cl. 16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 823 rewrote subdivision 2.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 870 and 932, effective April 4, 2007, are identical, and in subdivision 2, inserted the clause (i) designation, added “or” to the end of clause (i) and added clause (ii).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and substituted “subdivision B 2” for “subdivision B 5” in the last sentence of subdivision 2.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 106, effective January 1, 2013, are identical, and substituted “subdivision B 3 b of
§

4.1-216

” for “subdivision 3 b of subsection B of §

4.1-216

” in subdivision 2. Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 106 also updated the reference to §

3.2-102

, but the reference was previously updated by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision 2, substituted “subdivision 3 of §

4.1-206.2

” for “§

4.1-207.1

” in the last sentence in clause (ii); and in subdivision 6, substituted “§

4.1-231.1

” for “§

4.1-231

.”

§ 4.1-224.
Notice and hearings for refusal to grant licenses; Administrative Process Act; exceptions.

The action of the Board in granting or in refusing to grant any license shall be subject to review in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), except as provided in subsections B and C. Review shall be limited to the evidential record of the proceedings provided by the Board. Both the petitioner and the Board shall have the right to appeal to the Court of Appeals from any order of the court.

The Board may refuse a hearing on any application for the granting of any retail alcoholic beverage or mixed beverage license, including a banquet license, provided such:

License for the applicant has been refused or revoked within a period of twelve months;

License for any premises has been refused or revoked at that location within a period of twelve months;

Applicant, within a period of twelve months immediately preceding, has permitted a license granted by the Board to expire for nonpayment of license tax, and at the time of expiration of such license, there was a pending and unadjudicated charge, either before the Board or in any court, against the licensee alleging a violation of this subtitle; or

Applicant has received a restricted license and reapplies for a lesser-restricted license at the same location within twelve months of the date of the issuance of the restricted license.

If an applicant has permitted a license to expire for nonpayment of license tax, and at the time of expiration there remained unexecuted any period of suspension imposed upon the licensee by the Board, the Board may refuse a hearing on an application for a new license until after the date on which the suspension period would have been executed had the license not have been permitted to expire.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-31; 1954, c. 301; 1956, c. 523; 1972, c. 178; 1974, c. 267; 1976, cc. 67, 698; 1978, c. 446; 1980, c. 299; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 703; 1986, cc. 94, 615; 1989, c. 311; 1990, c. 727; 1992, c. 161; 1993, c. 866; 2000, c. 147.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 147 deleted “or” at the end of subdivision B 2, added “or” at the end of subdivision B 3, and added subdivision B 4.

§ 4.1-225.
Grounds for which Board may suspend or revoke licenses.

The Board may suspend or revoke any license other than a brewery license, in which case the Board may impose penalties as provided in §

4.1-227

, if it has reasonable cause to believe that:

The licensee, or if the licensee is a partnership, any general partner thereof, or if the licensee is an association, any member thereof, or a limited partner of 10 percent or more with voting rights, or if the licensee is a corporation, any officer, director, or shareholder owning 10 percent or more of its capital stock, or if the licensee is a limited liability company, any member-manager or any member owning 10 percent or more of the membership interest of the limited liability company:

Has misrepresented a material fact in applying to the Board for such license;

Within the five years immediately preceding the date of the hearing held in accordance with §

4.1-227

, has (i) been convicted of a violation of any law, ordinance or regulation of the Commonwealth, of any county, city or town in the Commonwealth, of any state, or of the United States, applicable to the manufacture, transportation, possession, use or sale of alcoholic beverages; (ii) violated any provision of Chapter 3 (§

4.1-300

et seq.); (iii) committed a violation of the Wine Franchise Act (§

4.1-400

et seq.) or the Beer Franchise Act (§

4.1-500

et seq.) in bad faith; (iv) violated or failed or refused to comply with any regulation, rule or order of the Board; or (v) failed or refused to comply with any of the conditions or restrictions of the license granted by the Board;

Has been convicted in any court of a felony or of any crime or offense involving moral turpitude under the laws of any state, or of the United States;

Is not the legitimate owner of the business conducted under the license granted by the Board, or other persons have ownership interests in the business which have not been disclosed;

Cannot demonstrate financial responsibility sufficient to meet the requirements of the business conducted under the license granted by the Board;

Has been intoxicated or under the influence of some self-administered drug while upon the licensed premises;

Has maintained the licensed premises in an unsanitary condition, or allowed such premises to become a meeting place or rendezvous for members of a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

or persons of ill repute, or has allowed any form of illegal gambling to take place upon such premises;

Knowingly employs in the business conducted under such license, as agent, servant, or employee, other than a busboy, cook or other kitchen help, any person who has been convicted in any court of a felony or of any crime or offense involving moral turpitude, or who has violated the laws of the Commonwealth, of any other state, or of the United States, applicable to the manufacture, transportation, possession, use or sale of alcoholic beverages;

Subsequent to the granting of his original license, has demonstrated by his police record a lack of respect for law and order;

Has allowed the consumption of alcoholic beverages upon the licensed premises by any person whom he knew or had reason to believe was (i) less than 21 years of age, (ii) interdicted, or (iii) intoxicated, or has allowed any person whom he knew or had reason to believe was intoxicated to loiter upon such licensed premises;

Has allowed any person to consume upon the licensed premises any alcoholic beverages except as provided under this subtitle;

Is physically unable to carry on the business conducted under such license or has been adjudicated incapacitated;

Has allowed any obscene literature, pictures or materials upon the licensed premises;

Has possessed any illegal gambling apparatus, machine or device upon the licensed premises;

Has upon the licensed premises (i) illegally possessed, distributed, sold or used, or has knowingly allowed any employee or agent, or any other person, to illegally possess, distribute, sell or use marijuana, controlled substances, imitation controlled substances, drug paraphernalia or controlled paraphernalia as those terms are defined in Articles 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) and 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 and the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.); (ii) laundered money in violation of §

18.2-246.3

; or (iii) conspired to commit any drug-related offense in violation of Article 1 or 1.1 of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or the Drug Control Act. The provisions of this subdivision shall also apply to any conduct related to the operation of the licensed business that facilitates the commission of any of the offenses set forth herein;

Has failed to take reasonable measures to prevent (i) the licensed premises, (ii) any premises immediately adjacent to the licensed premises that are owned or leased by the licensee, or (iii) any portion of public property immediately adjacent to the licensed premises from becoming a place where patrons of the establishment commit criminal violations of Article 1 (§

18.2-30

et seq.), 2 (§

18.2-38

et seq.), 2.1 (§

18.2-46.1

et seq.), 2.2 (§

18.2-46.4

et seq.), 3 (§

18.2-47

et seq.), 4 (§

18.2-51

et seq.), 5 (§

18.2-58

et seq.), 6 (§

18.2-59

et seq.), or 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2; Article 2 (§

18.2-266

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2; Article 3 (§

18.2-346

et seq.) or 5 (§

18.2-372

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2; or Article 1 (§

18.2-404

et seq.), 2 (§

18.2-415

), or 3 (§

18.2-416

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 18.2 and such violations lead to arrests that are so frequent and serious as to reasonably be deemed a continuing threat to the public safety; or

Has failed to take reasonable measures to prevent an act of violence resulting in death or serious bodily injury, or a recurrence of such acts, from occurring on (i) the licensed premises, (ii) any premises immediately adjacent to the licensed premises that is owned or leased by the licensee, or (iii) any portion of public property immediately adjacent to the licensed premises.

The place occupied by the licensee:

The licensee or any employee of the licensee discriminated against any member of the armed forces of the United States by prices charged or otherwise.

The licensee, his employees, or any entertainer performing on the licensed premises has been convicted of a violation of a local public nudity ordinance for conduct occurring on the licensed premises and the licensee allowed such conduct to occur.

Any cause exists for which the Board would have been entitled to refuse to grant such license had the facts been known.

The licensee is delinquent for a period of 90 days or more in the payment of any taxes, or any penalties or interest related thereto, lawfully imposed by the locality where the licensed business is located, as certified by the treasurer, commissioner of the revenue, or finance director of such locality, unless (i) the outstanding amount is de minimis; (ii) the licensee has pending a bona fide application for correction or appeal with respect to such taxes, penalties, or interest; or (iii) the licensee has entered into a payment plan approved by the same locality to settle the outstanding liability.

Any other cause authorized by this subtitle.

a.

Does not conform to the requirements of the governing body of the county, city or town in which such establishment is located, with respect to sanitation, health, construction or equipment, or to any similar requirements established by the laws of the Commonwealth or by Board regulations;

b.

Has been adjudicated a common nuisance under the provisions of this subtitle or §

18.2-258

; or

c.

Has become a meeting place or rendezvous for illegal gambling, illegal users of narcotics, drunks, prostitutes, pimps, panderers or habitual law violators or has become a place where illegal drugs are regularly used or distributed. The Board may consider the general reputation in the community of such establishment in addition to any other competent evidence in making such determination.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-37; 1956, c. 521; 1970, cc. 545, 676; 1976, cc. 696, 698, 702; 1978, c. 579; 1979, c. 537; 1980, c. 299; 1981, cc. 24, 586, 600; 1982, c. 214; 1983, c. 608; 1984, cc. 180, 200, 703; 1985, c. 559; 1986, cc. 101, 318, 615; 1987, c. 252; 1991, c. 468; 1992, cc. 161, 820; 1993, c. 866; 1996, c. 404; 1997, c. 801; 2002, c. 352; 2003, c. 594; 2007, c. 103; 2008, cc. 185, 794; 2009, c. 486; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2013, c. 661; 2014, cc. 233, 674, 719; 2017, cc. 698, 707; 2020, c. 122.

Cross references.

As to contemplated actions by brewery or wholesaler, see
§

4.1-509.1

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, in subdivision 1 o, substituted “Articles 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) and 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.)” for “Articles 1 and 1.1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.)” and “Article 1 or 1.1 of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or the Drug Control Act” for “Articles 1 and 1.1 of Chapter 7 (§ 18.2-247 et seq.) of Title 18.2 or the Drug Control Act (§ 18.2-247 et seq.)” to correct the citation style.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 352 added subdivision 4; and redesignated former subdivisions 4 and 5 as present subdivisions 5 and 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 594 substituted “10” for “ten” in subdivision 1; substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in clause 1 k (i); and inserted “or has become a place where illegal drugs are regularly used or distributed” in subdivision 2 c.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 103 rewrote the introductory paragraph of subdivision 1.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 185 inserted “members of a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

or” in subdivision 1 h.

The 2008 amendments by c. 794, in subdivision 1 h, deleted “allowed noisy, lewd or disorderly conduct upon the licensed premises, or has” at the beginning and substituted “maintained the licensed premises” for “maintained such premises”; and substituted “any obscene literature, pictures or materials” for “any lewd, obscene or indecent literature, pictures or materials” in subdivsion 1 n.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 486, added subdivision 1 q and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and deleted “of this title” at the end of clause 1 c (ii); and inserted “or synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” at the end of clause 1 p (i).

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 661, deleted former subdivision 1 b, which read: “Has defrauded or attempted to defraud the Board, or any federal, state or local government or governmental agency or authority, by making or filing any report, document or tax return required by statute or regulation which is fraudulent or contains a false representation of a material fact; or has willfully deceived or attempted to deceive the Board, or any federal, state or local government, or governmental agency or authority, by making or maintaining business records required by statute or regulation which are false or fraudulent,” and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 233 added subdivision 6 and redesignated former subdivision 6 as subdivision 7.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “or synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” following “(§

54.1-3400

et seq.)” in subdivision 1 o.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and added subdivision 1 q and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 122 substituted “§

18.2-346

” for “§

18.2-344

” in subdivision 1 p.

Law Review.

For article discussing decisions of Virginia courts dealing with state administrative procedures between June 1, 2002 and June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2003).

§ 4.1-225.1.
Summary suspension in emergency circumstances; grounds; notice and hearing.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act or §

4.1-227

or

4.1-229

, the Board may summarily suspend any license or permit if it has reasonable cause to believe that an act of violence resulting in death or serious bodily injury, or a recurrence of such acts, has occurred on (i) the licensed premises, (ii) any premises immediately adjacent to the licensed premises that is owned or leased by the licensee, or (iii) any portion of public property immediately adjacent to the licensed premises, and the Board finds that there exists a continuing threat to public safety and that summary suspension of the license or permit is justified to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the public.

Prior to issuing an order of suspension pursuant to this section, special agents of the Board shall conduct an initial investigation and submit all findings to the Secretary of the Board within 48 hours of any such act of violence. If the Board determines suspension is warranted, it shall immediately notify the licensee of its intention to temporarily suspend his license pending the outcome of a formal investigation. Such temporary suspension shall remain effective for a minimum of 48 hours. After the 48-hour period, the licensee may petition the Board for a restricted license pending the results of the formal investigation and proceedings for disciplinary review. If the Board determines that a restricted license is warranted, the Board shall have discretion to impose appropriate restrictions based on the facts presented.

Upon a determination to temporarily suspend a license, the Board shall immediately commence a formal investigation. The formal investigation shall be completed within 10 days of its commencement and the findings reported immediately to the Secretary of the Board. If, following the formal investigation, the Secretary of the Board determines that suspension of the license is warranted, a hearing shall be held within five days of the completion of the formal investigation. A decision shall be rendered within 10 days of conclusion of the hearing. If a decision is not rendered within 10 days of the conclusion of the hearing, the order of suspension shall be vacated and the license reinstated. Any appeal by the licensee shall be filed within 10 days of the decision and heard by the Board within 20 days of the decision. The Board shall render a decision on the appeal within 10 days of the conclusion of the appeal hearing.

Service of any order of suspension issued pursuant to this section shall be made by a special agent of the Board in person and by certified mail to the licensee. The order of suspension shall take effect immediately upon service.

This section shall not apply to (i) temporary licenses granted under §

4.1-211

or temporary permits granted under §

4.1-212

, either of which may be revoked summarily in accordance with §

4.1-211

, or (ii) licenses granted pursuant to subdivision 7 or 8 of §

4.1-206.1

or subdivision 1 or 2 of §

4.1-206.2

.

History.

2016, c. 42; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “subdivision 7 or 8 of §

4.1-206.1

or subdivision 1 or 2 of §

4.1-206.2

” for “subdivision 2 or 3 of §

4.1-207

or subdivision 4 or 5 of §

4.1-208

” in subsection E in clause (ii).

§ 4.1-226.
Grounds for which Board shall suspend or revoke licenses.

The Board shall suspend or revoke any license, other than a brewery license, in which case the Board may impose penalties as provided in §

4.1-227

, if it finds that:

A licensee has violated or permitted the violation of §

18.2-331

, relating to the illegal possession of a gambling device, upon the premises for which the Board has granted a license for the sale of alcoholic beverages to the public.

In the licensed establishment of a mixed beverage licensee there (i) is entertainment of an obscene nature, entertainment commonly called stripteasing, topless entertaining, or entertainment that has employees who are not clad both above and below the waist or (ii) are employees who solicit the sale of alcoholic beverages. The provisions of clause (i) shall not apply to persons operating theaters, concert halls, art centers, museums, or similar establishments that are devoted primarily to the arts or theatrical performances, when the performances that are presented are expressing matters of serious literary, artistic, scientific, or political value.

A licensee has defrauded or attempted to defraud the Board, or any federal, state, or local government or governmental agency or authority, by making or filing any report, document, or tax return required by statute or regulation that is fraudulent or contains a willful or knowing false representation of a material fact or has willfully deceived or attempted to deceive the Board, or any federal, state, or local government or governmental agency or authority, by making or maintaining business records required by statute or regulation that are false or fraudulent.

History.

Code 1950, § 18.1-335; 1960, c. 358, § 4-37.1; 1968, c. 7, § 4-98.9; 1974, c. 548; 1975, c. 224; 1993, c. 866; 2008, c. 794; 2013, c. 661.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 794, in subdivision 2,
rewrote clause (i) and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 661 added subdivision 3.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 32.